Virginia statutes. Title 21. Drainage, Soil Conservation, Sanitation and Public Facilities Districts.
Article 1. General Provisions.
§ 21-118.4.
Certain additional powers of governing body.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, when an ordinance has been adopted creating a sanitary district in such county, the board of supervisors or other governing body hereinafter referred to as “board of supervisors” shall have the following powers and duties, in addition to such powers and duties created by any law, subject to the conditions and limitations hereinafter prescribed:

To construct, reconstruct, maintain, alter, improve, add to, and operate dams, motor vehicle parking lots, water supply, drainage, sewerage, garbage disposal, heat, light, power, gas, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, streets and street name signs, and fire-fighting systems, for the use and benefit of the public in such sanitary district and as to such motor vehicle parking lots systems to make such charges for the use of such facilities as may be prescribed by said board or body;

(a1)

To acquire, construct, maintain, and operate, or to contract for such acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation, within such sanitary district, such community buildings, community centers, other recreational facilities, and advisory community planning councils as the board may deem expedient or advisable, and to make such charges for the use of such facilities as may be prescribed by the board;

To acquire by gift, condemnation, purchase, lease, or otherwise, and to maintain and operate any such dams, motor vehicle parking lots, water supply, drainage, sewerage, garbage disposal, heat, light, power, gas, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, streets and street name signs, and fire-fighting systems in such district;

To contract with any person, firm, corporation, municipality, county, authority, or the federal government or any agency thereof to acquire, construct, reconstruct, maintain, alter, improve, add to, and operate any such dams, motor vehicle parking lots, water supply, drainage, sewerage, garbage removal and disposal, heat, light, power, gas, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, streets and street name signs, and fire-fighting systems in such district, and to accept the funds of, or to reimburse from any available source, such person, firm, corporation, municipality, county, authority, or the federal government or any agency thereof for either the whole or any part of the costs, expenses, and charges incident to the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, maintenance, alteration, improvement, addition to, and operation of any such system or systems;

To require owners or tenants of any property in the district to connect with any such system or systems, and to contract with the owners or tenants for such connections. In order to require owners or tenants of any property in the district to connect with any such system or systems, the board of supervisors shall have power and authority to adopt ordinances so requiring owners or tenants to connect with such systems, and to use the same, and the board of supervisors shall have power to provide for a punishment in the ordinance of not exceeding a $50 fine for each failure and refusal to so connect with such systems, or to use the same. Before adopting any such ordinance the board of supervisors shall give public notice of the intention to propose the same for passage by posting handbill notices of such proposal in three or more public places in the sanitary district at least 10 days prior to the time the ordinance shall be proposed for passage. The ordinance shall not become effective after its passage until 10 days’ like notice has been given by posting copies of such ordinance in three or more public places in the district. The board of supervisors, in lieu of giving notice in such manner, may cause notice to be published in the manner provided in §

15.2-1427

for imposing or increasing any tax or levy. Violations of such ordinances shall be tried before the county court of the county as is provided for trial of misdemeanors, and with like right of appeal;

To fix and prescribe or change the rates of charge for the use of any such system or systems, the rate of charge for connection to any such system or systems, a late charge not to exceed 10 percent of the amount due or $10, whichever is the greater, and interest on outstanding bills at the rate provided for in §

58.1-3918

, after a public hearing upon notice as provided in subdivision (d) and to provide for the collection of such charges. In fixing such rates the sanitary district may seek the advice of the State Corporation Commission. The Commission may charge the district a reasonable fee for any advice given pursuant to this section. The board of supervisors may provide for the exemption from, deferral of or reduction of the rates of charge for the use of any garbage disposal system or systems by persons at least 65 years of age or persons permanently and totally disabled as defined in §

58.1-3217

. Any such exemptions, deferrals or reductions may be conditioned upon only the income criteria as provided by §

58.1-3211

as in effect on December 31, 2010. And to enable the board to enforce the collection of charges for the use of any such system against the person or persons, firm or corporation using the same, the charges when made for the use of any such system shall be collectible by distress, levy, garnishment, attachment or otherwise without recourse to court procedure, except so far as the selected procedure may require the same. And the board shall have power to designate as its agent for the purpose of collection such officer or officers or person or persons as it may determine, and the officer or officers or person or persons shall be vested with the same power and authority as a sheriff or constable may have in like procedure.Water and sewer connection fees established by any county, city, town, or sanitary district shall be fair and reasonable. Such fees shall be reviewed by the county, city, town or sanitary district periodically and shall be adjusted, if necessary, to assure that they continue to be fair and reasonable. Nothing herein shall affect existing contracts with bondholders which are in conflict with any of the foregoing provisions.If any rates, fees or charges for the use of and for the services furnished by any system acquired or constructed by the sanitary district under the provisions of this chapter shall not be paid within 30 days after the same shall become due and payable, and the person who incurred the debt is the occupant of such premises, the board may at the expiration of such 30-day period disconnect the premises from the water and/or sewer system, or otherwise suspend services, and the board may proceed to recover the amount of any such delinquent rates, fees or charges, with interest, in a civil action.If any rates, fees, or charges for the use and services of any water or sewer system acquired or constructed by the sanitary district under the provisions of this chapter shall not be paid within 30 days after the same becomes due and payable, the occupant-debtor of such premises shall cease to dispose of sewage or industrial wastes originating from or on such premises by discharge thereof directly or indirectly into the sewer system until such rates, fees, or charges with interest shall be paid. If such occupant-debtor does not cease such disposal at the expiration of such 30-day period, the political subdivision or district or other public corporation, board, or body supplying water to or selling water for use on such premises may, within five days after the receipt of notice of such delinquency, cease to supply water to or to sell water to such occupant-debtor. If such political subdivision or district or public corporation, board, or body shall not, at the expiration of such five-day period, cease supplying water to or selling water for use by such occupant-debtor, then the governing body within whose geographical boundaries such sanitary district lies may shut off the supply of water to such person.The water supply to or for any occupant-debtor shall not be shut off or stopped under the provisions of this section, if the State Health Commissioner, upon application of the local board of health or health officer of the county, city or town wherein such water is supplied or such real estate is located, shall have found and shall certify to the authorities charged with the responsibility of ceasing to supply or sell such water, or to shut off the supply of such water, that ceasing to supply or shutting off such water supply will endanger the health of such person or the health of others in such county, city or town.Any unpaid charge shall become a lien superior to the interest of any owner, lessee or tenant, and next in succession to county taxes, on the real property on which the use of any such system was made and for which the charge was imposed. However, such lien shall not bind or affect a subsequent bona fide purchaser of such real estate for valuable consideration without actual notice of such lien, except and until from the time that the amount of such charge is entered in the Judgment Lien Docket kept in the office where deeds may be recorded in the political subdivision wherein the real estate or a part thereof is located. It shall be the duty of the clerk in whose office deeds may be recorded to keep and preserve and hold available for public inspection such Judgment Lien Docket and to cause entries to be made and indexed therein from time to time upon certification by the board for which he shall be entitled to a fee of five dollars per entry to be paid by the board and added to the amount of the lien.No such lien shall be placed by the board unless the board or its billing and collection agent (i) shall have advised the owner of such real estate at the time of initiating service to a lessee or tenant of such real estate that a lien will be placed on such real estate if the lessee or tenant fails to pay any fees, rents or other charges when due for services rendered to such lessee or tenant; (ii) shall have mailed to the owner of such real estate a duplicate copy of the final bill rendered to such lessee or tenant at the time of rendering the final bill to such lessee or tenant; and (iii) shall employ the same collection efforts and practices to collect amounts due the board from a lessee or a tenant as are employed with respect to collection of such amounts due from customers who are owners of the real estate for which service is provided.Such lien on any real estate may be discharged by the payment to the board of the total amount of such lien, and interest accrued thereon to the date of such payment, and the entry fee of two dollars, and it shall be the duty of the board to deliver a certificate thereof to the person paying the same, and upon presentation thereof and the payment of the further fee of one dollar by such person, the clerk having the record of such lien shall mark the entry of such lien satisfied.Jurisdiction to enforce any such lien shall be in equity and the court may decree the real estate subject to the lien, or any part thereof, to be sold and the proceeds applied to the payment of such lien and the interest which may accrue to the date of such payment.Nothing contained herein shall be construed to prejudice the right of the board to recover the amount of such lien, or of the charge, and the interest which may accrue, by action at law or otherwise, which relief shall be cumulative and not alternative;

To employ and fix the compensation of any technical, clerical, or other force and help which from time to time, in their judgment, may be deemed necessary for the construction, operation, or maintenance of any such system or systems;

To negotiate and contract with any person, firm, corporation, county, authority, or municipality with regard to the connection of any system or systems with any other system or systems now in operation or hereafter to be established, and with regard to any other matter necessary and proper for the construction or operation and maintenance of any such system within the sanitary district;

To contract for the extension of any such system into territory outside of the district, and for the use thereof, upon such terms and conditions as the board may from time to time determine upon;

With respect to the maintenance and operation of said motor vehicle parking lots system, the board is authorized to purchase, install, maintain, and operate, and to fix and charge parking meter fees for the use of, such parking lot or lots;

Insofar as is permitted by Article VIII, Section 5 and Article VIII, Section 7 of the Constitution of Virginia to construct or contract to construct within such sanitary district, at the request of the school board and subject to all provisions of law applicable to the construction of school buildings, and additions thereto;

To borrow not earlier than January 1 of any year, or the first day of the fiscal year of the district, for the purpose of meeting casual deficits in the revenue of the district or creating a debt in anticipation of the collection of the revenue of the district, a sum of money not to exceed one-half of the amount reasonably anticipated to be produced by the revenues of the district, including taxes levied pursuant to §

21-119

, for the year in which the loan is negotiated; provided, there shall be excluded from the amount reasonably anticipated to be produced by the revenue of the district any anticipated tax revenues of the district which have not actually been levied and assessed against property within the district.Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, any sanitary district is empowered to borrow in advance of grants and reimbursements due the district from the federal and state governments for the purpose of meeting appropriations for the then current fiscal year. “Grants” and “reimbursements” as used herein shall mean grants which the district has been formally advised in writing it will receive, and reimbursements on moneys which the federal or state governments are obligated to pay the district on account of expenditures made in anticipation of receiving such payment from the federal or state government. The district may borrow the full amount of the grant or reimbursement that the federal or state government is obligated to pay at the time the loan is issued. The loan shall be repaid within 60 days of the time the grant or reimbursement is received, but in any event, the loan shall be repaid within one year from the date of its issue.Such temporary loans shall be evidenced by notes or bonds, negotiable or nonnegotiable as the board of supervisors may determine; shall bear interest at a rate as provided in §

2.2-5000

; and shall be repaid not later than either December 15 of the year in which they are borrowed or 15 days before the last day of the fiscal year of the district. No extension of any such loan shall be valid. No additional loan under this subsection shall be made until all temporary loans of preceding years shall have been paid. No election shall be required for the issuance of any bond pursuant to the provisions of this subsection. Except as this subsection otherwise provides, any bonds issued pursuant to this subsection may be issued in accordance with the provisions of §§

21-130

through

21-136

;

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, where the use of any water or sewer systems described in this section is contracted for by an occupant who is not the owner of the premises and where such occupant’s premises are separately metered for service, the owner of any such premises shall be liable only for the payment of delinquent rates or charges applicable to three delinquent billing periods but not to exceed a period of 90 days for such delinquency. No board shall refuse to service other premises of the owner not occupied by an occupant who is delinquent in the payment of such rates or charges on account of such delinquency provided that such owner has paid in full any delinquent charges for which he would be responsible for paying. No board shall refuse to service or unreasonably delay reinstatement of service to premises where such occupant who is delinquent has vacated the premises and a new party has applied for service provided such owner has paid in full such delinquent charges as he would be responsible for paying.

History.

1962, c. 571; 1964, c. 517; 1970, c. 674; 1975, cc. 251, 490; 1976, c. 684; 1977, c. 516; 1981, cc. 554, 563, 564; 1982, c. 447; 1983, c. 422; 1994, c. 432; 1997, c. 12; 2000, c. 230; 2011, cc. 438, 496; 2012, c. 485; 2017, c. 14.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 230 added the fourth and fifth sentences in the first paragraph of subdivision (e).

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 438 and 496, effective March 24, 2011, and applicable for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, are identical, and in the first paragraph in subdivision (e), added “as in effect on December 31, 2010” in the fifth sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 485, effective March 30, 2012, inserted “dams” preceding “motor vehicle parking lots” in subdivisions (a), (b) and (c); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 14 substituted “ordinance has been adopted” for “order has been entered” in the introductory paragraph.

Law Review.

For Washington & Lee Law Alumni Association Student Notes Colloquium, “If a Tree Falls in a Roadway, Is Anyone Liable?: Proposing the Duty of Reasonable Care for Virginia’s Road-Maintaining Entities,” see 76 Wash & Lee L. Rev. 509 (2019).

§ 21-118.5.
Unified water supply and sewerage systems for counties and sanitary districts; power of county governing body to fix rates; application of Public Finance Act.

Whenever the board of supervisors of any county, as the governing board of such county, shall enter into, or has heretofore entered into, an agreement with one or more sanitary districts located within such county whereby the county has agreed to connect, operate, maintain, alter, improve, add to and extend within and without the territory of such sanitary district or districts the water supply or sewerage systems, or the water supply and sewerage systems, of such county and such district or districts, or the water supply or sewerage systems, or the water supply and sewerage systems, of two or more such sanitary districts, in the manner of and as a unified single water supply or sewerage system, or a unified single water supply and sewerage system, each of which is hereinafter referred to in this chapter as a “unified system,” then, notwithstanding the provisions of the first sentence of §

21-118.4 (e)

, such board of supervisors is empowered to fix and prescribe the rate of charge for the use of such unified system with a view to the needs of such unified system as a whole. Such unified system shall constitute a “project” and a “revenue producing undertaking” for the purposes of and as defined in the Public Finance Act, Chapter 26 (§

15.2-2600

et seq.) of Title 15.2. Such county in respect of such project and revenue producing undertaking shall have all the powers granted to counties by the Public Finance Act. Water and sewer connection fees established by any county, city, town or sanitary district shall be fair and reasonable. Such fees shall be reviewed by the county, city, town or sanitary district periodically and shall be adjusted, if necessary, to assure that they continue to be fair and reasonable. Nothing herein shall affect existing contracts with bondholders which are in conflict with any of the foregoing provisions.

History.

1972, c. 221; 1997, c. 12.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Sanitary district is limited to operating and maintaining

community buildings and recreational facilities that are located within the boundaries of the district, unless it reaches an agreement with another jurisdiction to operate buildings and facilities outside those boundaries. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Clifford L. “Clay” Athey, Jr., Member, House of Delegates, 10-073, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 55 (9/9/10).

§ 21-118.6.
Same; application of revenues; tax levy where revenues insufficient.

Whenever a county and one or more sanitary districts have entered into an agreement for a unified water supply or sewerage system, or unified water supply and sewerage system, and such county has agreed therein to pay from the revenues of such unified system the principal of and interest on all bonds issued for water or sewer purposes, or both, as the case may be, by such sanitary district or districts, and to impose such schedule of rates, rentals, fees and charges for the use and services of such unified system so as to produce revenues sufficient for such payment, such county may also apply the revenues derived from such rates, rentals, fees and charges to the payment of the cost of operation and maintenance of the unified system, to the cost of renewals and replacements and to any other lawful purposes connected with or pertaining to such unified system, including the making of additions to and expansions of such unified system, to the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds issued by such county for the purpose of such unified system and to the creation and maintenance of such reserves as may be deemed necessary by such county to effect any financing for such unified system. The order of any priority of the application of such revenues to any of the foregoing purposes, including to the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds of the sanitary districts, may be determined by the board of supervisors as the governing body of the county. If at any time the revenues derived from rates, rentals, fees and charges for the use and services of such unified system, are insufficient to provide for the operation and maintenance of the unified system, and for payment of principal of and interest on such bonded indebtedness of the sanitary district as the same shall become due, such sanitary district shall levy an annual tax upon all property in such sanitary district subject to local taxation to pay such principal and interest as the same shall become due. Nothing contained in the immediately preceding sentence shall, however, be construed to relieve the county of its obligations under any such agreement to impose rates, rentals, fees and charges for the use and services of such system sufficient to pay such costs of operation and maintenance and to provide for the payment of such principal and interest.

History.

1972, c. 221.

§ 21-118.7.
Same; payment to county of revenues held by district.

Any agreement for the creation of a unified system may provide for the payment over to the county of net revenues held by the district or districts theretofore derived from the water supply or sewerage systems, or both, of the district or districts that are to become part of such unified system.

History.

1972, c. 221.

§ 21-118.8.
Same; ratification of prior agreements.

Any agreement heretofore entered by a county with one or more sanitary districts with respect to a unified system containing provisions substantially in compliance with §§

21-118.5

,

21-118.6

or

21-118.7

, and the proceedings heretofore taken with respect to such agreement, are hereby ratified, validated, confirmed and approved, notwithstanding that any provisions of said agreement may have been inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter prior to the enactment of §§

21-118.5

to

21-118.8

.

History.

1972, c. 221.

§ 21-119.
Sanitary districts are special taxing districts; nature of improvements; jurisdiction of governing bodies, etc., not affected.

Each sanitary district created or purported to be created by the governing body of a county, heretofore or hereafter made and adopted pursuant to any general law of the Commonwealth, is hereby determined to be and is hereby made, from and after the date of such creation or purported creation, a special taxing district for the purposes for which created; and any improvements heretofore or hereafter made by or for any such district are hereby determined to be general tax improvements and of general benefit to all of the property within the sanitary district, as distinct from peculiar or special benefits to some or all of the property within the sanitary district.

Neither the creation of the sanitary districts as special taxing districts nor any other provision in this chapter shall in any wise affect the authority, power and jurisdiction of the respective county governing bodies, sheriffs, treasurers, commissioners of the revenue, circuit courts, clerks, judges, magistrates or any other county, district or state officer over the area embraced in any such district, nor shall the same restrict or affect in any way any county, or the governing body of any county, from imposing on and collecting from abutting landowners, or other landowners receiving special or peculiar benefits, in any such district, taxes or assessments for local public improvements as permitted by the Constitution and by other statutes of the Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding subsections A and B, the board of supervisors of Buckingham County, Nottoway County, or Westmoreland County may impose on, and collect from, landowners abutting a street being improved by the sanitary district a user fee for such service. Such fee may be enforced as provided in §

21-118.4

.

History.

1936, p. 497; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560s3; 1997, c. 261; 2005, c. 839; 2007, c. 813; 2017, c. 14.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, c. 813, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the powers of any locality with respect to any ordinance, resolution or bylaw validly adopted and not repealed or rescinded prior to July 1, 2007.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 839, effective October 1, 2005, substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” twice in subsection A; and substituted “judges, magistrates” for “trial justices, justices of the peace” in subsection B.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 813 substituted “Buckingham County, Nottoway County, or Westmoreland County” for “any county with a population between 15,400 and 15,950” in subsection C.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 14, in subsection A, substituted “the governing body of a county, heretofore or hereafter made and adopted” for “an order of the circuit court of any county of the Commonwealth, or a judge thereof heretofore or hereafter made and entered” and in subsection C, deleted “of this section” following “subsections A and B.”

§ 21-119.1.
Transfer of certain sanitary districts to towns.

The governing body of any county in which a sanitary district has been established and subsequent thereto a town has been created, the boundaries of such town being the same as those of the sanitary district, is authorized to transfer all jurisdiction and control over such district to such town.

Such transfer shall be subject to approval by the bondholders.

Upon the transfer of such district to the town all power and authority of the county over the affairs of such district shall terminate and all such power and authority shall be transferred to and vest in the governing body of the town and all obligations and indebtedness of such district shall be and become an obligation of the town. Such transfer shall not be made, unless, in addition to the other conditions herein set forth, the governing body of such town assents thereto.

History.

1952, c. 626.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1952 act having assigned no number.

§ 21-120.
In certain cities and counties.

Chapter 161 of the Acts of 1926, as amended, codified as §§ 1560a-1560l2 of Michie Code 1942 and Michie Suppl. 1946, and last amended by chapter 465 of the Acts of 1948, providing for sanitary districts in counties having more than 500 inhabitants per square mile or adjoining a county having more than 1,000 inhabitants per square mile or adjoining a city having a population of 170,000 or more, is continued in effect. Chapter 189 of the Acts of 1932, codified as §§ 1560t-1560z of Michie Code 1942, providing for sanitary districts in counties having a population of between 35,000 and 37,000 according to the census of 1930, is continued in effect. Chapter 232 of the Acts of 1944, codified as § 1560l3 of Michie Suppl. 1946, relating to levy of sanitary district tax in lieu of issuance of bonds in counties having an area of more than forty-five and less than sixty square miles, is continued in effect. Chapter 305 of the Acts of 1944, as amended by Chapter 372 of the Acts of 1946, and Chapter 70 of the Acts of 1948, relating to levy of assessments in sanitary districts in counties adjoining a county having more than 1,000 inhabitants per square mile, is continued in effect.

The following amendments and repeal of Acts of Assembly continued in effect by this section are incorporated in this Code by this reference:

Amendments to Chapter 161, as amended, of the Acts of 1926.

Chapter 198 of the Acts of 1950.

Chapter 442 of the Acts of 1950.

Chapter 300 of the Acts of 1952.

Chapter 324 of the Acts of 1954.

Chapter 691 of the Acts of 1956.

Chapter 454 of the Acts of 1958.

Chapter 521 of the Acts of 1958.

Chapter 561 of the Acts of 1960.

Chapter 554 of the Acts of 1962.

Chapter 344 of the Acts of 1964.

Chapter 678 of the Acts of 1968.

Chapter 253 of the Acts of 1970.

Chapter 597 of the Acts of 1970.

Chapter 219 of the Acts of 1972.

Chapter 222 of the Acts of 1972.

Chapter 303 of the Acts of 1977.

Chapter 294 of the Acts of 1981.

Chapter 732 of the Acts of 1984.

Chapter 51 of the Acts of 1989.

Chapter 394 of the Acts of 1989.

Chapter 1025 of the Acts of 1999.

Repeal of Chapter 189 of the Acts of 1932.

Chapter 139 of the Acts of 1956.

§ 21-121.
Validation of proceedings.

All proceedings had in the creation of sanitary districts in the Commonwealth prior to January 1, 1970, whether under general law or by special act, are validated and confirmed, and all such districts so created or attempted to be created under existing law or by special act are declared to have been validly created and established notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in the creation thereof.

History.

1946, p. 64; 1958, c. 588; 1968, c. 62; 1970, c. 441.

§ 21-121.1.
Further validation of proceedings.

All proceedings had in the creation of sanitary districts in the Commonwealth prior to June 30, 1954, whether under general law or by special act, are validated and confirmed, and all such districts so created or attempted to be created, under existing general law or by special act, are declared to be validly created and established, notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in the creation thereof, including any curable unconstitutionality of a procedural character, such as failure of the act to correspond with title and such constitutional questions.

History.

1950, p. 4; 1954, c. 68.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1950 act having assigned no number.

§ 21-121.2.
Additional validation of proceedings.

All proceedings heretofore taken in the creation of sanitary districts of whatsoever kind in the Commonwealth of Virginia, whether under general law or special act, are hereby validated, ratified, approved and confirmed, and all such districts so created or attempted to be created thereunder are hereby declared to have been validly created and established, notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in the creation thereof.

History.

1960, c. 562; 1962, c. 26; 1964, c. 243.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1960 act having assigned no number.

§ 21-121.2:1.
Same; bond issues.

All proceedings heretofore taken in the creation of sanitary districts of whatsoever kind in the Commonwealth of Virginia, whether under general law or special act, are hereby validated, ratified, approved and confirmed, and all such districts so created or attempted to be created thereunder are hereby declared to have been validly created and established, notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in the creation thereof.

All proceedings heretofore taken and all elections heretofore held in sanitary districts of whatsoever kind in the Commonwealth of Virginia, whether under general law or special act, to provide for, and with respect to, the contracting of bonded indebtedness and the authorization, issuance, sale, execution and delivery of bonds by or on behalf of all such sanitary districts, are hereby validated, ratified, approved and confirmed, notwithstanding any lack of power of the governing body of the county in which any such district is located to authorize and issue such bonds, or to authorize the execution, sale or delivery thereof, and notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in any such proceedings or elections, or in such execution, sale or delivery; and such bonds so issued or to be issued are and shall be binding, legal, valid and enforceable obligations of any such sanitary districts, notwithstanding any statutory limitation on the amount thereof.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that this section shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes set out therein.

History.

1966, c. 199.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1966 act having assigned no number.

§ 21-121.3.
Powers of districts created under other laws.

Any sanitary district heretofore created under general law or special act shall have all of the powers specified in this article notwithstanding any limitations contained in any general law or special act pursuant to which such sanitary district was created and notwithstanding any limitations contained in the proceedings taken for the creation thereof.

History.

1964, c. 165.

§ 21-121.4.
Powers of boards of supervisors and other governing bodies of counties with respect to sanitary districts.

Notwithstanding anything in this article to the contrary, the board of supervisors or other governing body of a county and the requisite number of qualified voters may, with respect to any and all sanitary districts of whatsoever kind, whether heretofore or hereafter created pursuant to this article or pursuant to any other general or special act, exercise all of the powers granted them by §§

21-116

,

21-117

,

21-117.1

,

21-118

,

21-118.1

and

21-118.4

.

History.

1968, c. 275.

§ 21-121.5.
Validation of certain actions.

All proceedings had in the creation, enlargement or merger of sanitary districts in the Commonwealth prior to January 1, 1977, whether under general law or by special act, are validated and confirmed, and all such districts so created, enlarged or merged or attempted to be created, enlarged or merged under existing law or by special act are declared to have been validly created, established, enlarged or merged notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in the creation, enlargement or merger thereof.

History.

1977, c. 183.

§ 21-121.6.
Sanitary districts in certain counties with a water and sewer authority.

This section shall apply to any sanitary district created after January 1, 1993, in a county with an authority created pursuant to the Virginia Water and Waste Authorities Act (§

15.2-5100

et seq.).

The circuit court shall not enter an order pursuant to §

21-123

requiring an election until a resolution of the governing body requesting the entry of such order has been filed with the circuit court.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

21-125

and

21-128

, if an election conducted pursuant to §

21-124

indicates that a majority of the qualified voters of the sanitary district voting on the question are in favor of issuing bonds for a purpose for which the sanitary district was created, no bonds of the sanitary district shall be issued, and the circuit court shall not require the issuance of such bonds, without the approval of the governing body of the county.

If a sanitary district levies a tax upon property within the sanitary district pursuant to subdivision 6 of §

21-118

, such tax shall be based on the full assessed value of the taxable property within the sanitary district, notwithstanding any special use value assessment of property within the sanitary district for land preservation pursuant to Article 4 (§

58.1-3229

et seq.) of Chapter 32 of Title 58.1. In addition to the notice required pursuant to §

21-114

, the petitioners shall provide a written notice of the court hearing to each owner of property within the proposed district which is currently assessed at its use value pursuant to Article 4 (§

58.1-3229

et seq.) of Chapter 32 of Title 58.1. Such notice shall be mailed, first class, at least twenty-one days prior to the hearing to each such owner as listed in the current real estate assessment records, and an affidavit shall be filed with the court evidencing that such notice has been mailed.

The county’s claim of taxes and its lien on property pursuant to Article 11 (§

58.1-3340

et seq.) of Chapter 32 of Title 58.1 shall have priority over any claim or lien for any tax levied pursuant to subdivision 6 of §

21-118

.

The governing body of a sanitary district may enter into agreements with an authority created pursuant to the Virginia Water and Waste Authorities Act (§

15.2-5100

et seq.) for the construction, operation, use, control, ownership, and maintenance of any water supply, sewerage or other systems or facilities located within or outside of the boundaries of the sanitary district. Such agreements may provide that the authority will provide any service which the authority is permitted to provide and which the sanitary district may provide through the construction, establishment, maintenance, and operation of its own system or systems. The governing body of the county shall have the power to issue bonds of the sanitary district for the construction, establishment, and maintenance of any systems providing such service, whether such systems are owned by the sanitary district or the authority. The sanitary district and the authority may also agree on the imposition, collection, and use of rates, fees, and charges relating to such systems, including reimbursements by or to persons utilizing such systems. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 2 of §

21-118

, the sanitary district may sell, lease as lessor, transfer or dispose of any of its property, real, personal or mixed, to the authority without holding a public hearing.

History.

1993, c. 272.